Hawaii statutes.
[§676‑5] Procedure for approval of
transfers. (a) An application under this chapter for approval of a
transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall be made by the
transferee and may be brought in any court or before any responsible
administrative authority:

(1) In the county in which the payee resides;

(2) In the county in which the structured settlement
obligor or the annuity issuer maintains its principal place of business; or

(3) That approved the structured settlement
agreement.

(b) To apply for approval of a transfer of
structured settlement payment rights under section 676‑3, the transferee
shall file with the court or responsible administrative authority and serve on
all interested parties a notice of the proposed transfer and the application
for its authorization. The notice shall include:

(1) A copy of the transferee's application;

(2) A copy of the transfer agreement;

(3) A copy of the disclosure statement required under
section 676‑2;

(4) A listing of each of the payee's dependents,
together with each dependent's age;

(5) Notification that any interested party is
entitled to support, oppose, or otherwise respond to the transferee's
application, either in person or by counsel, by submitting written comments to
the court or responsible administrative authority or by participating in the
hearing; and

(6) Notification of the time and place of the hearing
and notification of the manner in which and the time by which written responses
to the application shall be filed, to be considered by the court or responsible
administrative authority; provided that the written responses shall be filed
not less than fifteen days after service of the transferee's notice. [L 2006, c
146, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next